District of Columbia statutes.
46-302.06

Continuing jurisdiction to enforce child-support order.

(a)

A tribunal of the District that has issued a child-support order consistent with the law of the District may serve as an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce:

(1)

The order if the order is the controlling order and has not been modified by a tribunal of another state that assumed jurisdiction pursuant to a law substantially similar to this chapter; or

(2)

A money judgment for arrears of support and interest on the order accrued before a determination that an order of another state is the controlling order.

(b)

A tribunal of the District having continuing jurisdiction over a support order may act as a responding tribunal to enforce the order.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 206, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(2)(D), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-302.02 and § 46-302.07.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-342.6.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote the section.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 206 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).